Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1493.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1909. Data collection on race and ethnicity in criminal cases.The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall collect and compile data on the race and ethnicity of defendants in criminal cases. The data shall be published in an easily accessible and user-friendly format on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts. The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall submit an annual report of the compiled data to the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency for analysis.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1493PN1747 - 2 - 1